Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1747.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 62 O.S. 2021, Section 34.36, as


amended by Section 2, Chapter 199, O.S.L. 2025 (62 O.S. Supp. 2025,


Section 34.36), is amended to read as follows:


Section 34.36. A. On the first day of October preceding each


regular session of the Legislature, each state agency, including


those created or established pursuant to constitutional provisions,


shall report to the Director of the Office of Management and


Enterprise Services and the Chair and Vice Chair of the Legislative


Oversight Committee on State Budget Performance an itemized request


showing the amount needed for the ensuing fiscal year beginning with


the first day of July.

Req. No. 3528 Page 1


B. The forms which must be used in making these reports shall


be approved by the Director of the Office of Management and


Enterprise Services and the Legislative Oversight Committee on State


Budget Performance.


C. The forms shall be uniform, and shall clearly designate the


information to be given.


D. The information provided shall include, but not be limited


to:


1. A budget analysis of existing and proposed programs


utilizing performance-informed budgeting techniques. Such analysis


shall be included as a part of the estimate of funds needed;


2. A statement listing any other state, federal or local


agencies which administer a similar or cooperating program and an


outline of the interaction among such agencies;


3. A statement of the statutory authority for the missions and


quantified objectives of each program;


4. A description of the groups of people served by each program


in the agency;


5. A quantification of the need for the program;


6. A description of the tactics which are intended to


accomplish each objective;


7. A list of quantifiable program outcomes which measure the


efficiency and effectiveness of each program;


8. A ranking of these programs by priority;

Req. No. 3528 Page 2


9. Actual program expenditures for the current fiscal year and


prior fiscal years and the number of personnel required to


accomplish each program;


10. Revenues expected to be generated by each program, if any;


11. With respect to appropriated state agencies, a detailed


listing of all employees and resources dedicated to the provision of


financial services including, but not limited to, procurement,


payroll, accounts receivable and accounts payable. The provisions


of this paragraph shall not be applicable to the Oklahoma State


Regents for Higher Education or to any institutions within The


Oklahoma State System of Higher Education; and


12. A certification that following the effective date of this


act and prior to July 1, 2011, no expenditure shall have been made


or funds encumbered for the purchase, lease, lease-purchase or


rental of any computers, software, telecom, information technology


hardware, firmware or information technology services, including


support services without the prior written approval of the State


Comptroller or his or her designee; and


13. A detailed report demonstrating how the agency shall


achieve a cost savings of ten percent (10%) when compared to the


previous fiscal year if for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2028,


and for subsequent fiscal years, a state agency is requesting an


increase in the appropriation compared to the appropriation received


the previous fiscal year.

Req. No. 3528 Page 3


E. These appropriated agencies shall make an itemized estimate


of needs for the ensuing fiscal year and the following two (2)


fiscal years and request for funds for the ensuing fiscal year and


an estimate of the revenues from all sources to be received by the


agency during the ensuing fiscal year and the following two (2)


fiscal years.


F. The Director of the Office of Management and Enterprise


Services shall electronically submit to the Governor and the


Legislative Oversight Committee on State Budget Performance no later


than the fifth day of October a complete list of all spending


agencies which have failed to submit budgets by October 1.


G. The reports required by this section shall include an


itemized listing of outstanding capital lease debt and estimated


capital lease needs for the ensuing fiscal year and the following


two (2) fiscal years, and shall be provided on forms prescribed by


the Director of the Office of Management and Enterprise Services.


H. For the purposes of this section, “capital lease” means a


lease-purchase agreement which provides an option for the State of


Oklahoma or its agencies to purchase property, including personal


and real property, which is the subject thereof and/or or a lease


agreement that provides an option for the State of Oklahoma or its


agencies to lease such property, which is the subject thereof, at a


nominal annual amount, after a period in which leased property is


rented at fair market value.

Req. No. 3528 Page 4


I. Not later than January 1, the Director of the Office of


Management and Enterprise Services shall publish a shared services


cost-performance assessment report documenting the amount of each


state agency’s cost for providing shared services. The lowest


ranking state agencies shall enter into a contract with the Office


of Management and Enterprise Services for the provision of shared


financial services, provided that the Director of the Office of


Management and Enterprise Services determines that implementation of


such a contract would be feasible and documents that the contractual


agreement will result in cost savings or efficiencies to the state.


Contracts required by this subsection shall be entered into at the


start of the next fiscal year. When a state agency is contracted


with the Office of Management and Enterprise Services for the


provision of shared financial services, the agency may discontinue


using shared services when documentation showing that the agency can


provide the services at a lower cost to the state is provided to and


approved by the Director of the Office of Management and Enterprise


Services. As used in this subsection, “shared services” means


process, resource utilization or action as defined by administrative


rule. On a yearly basis, the Director of the Office of Management


and Enterprise Services shall compile and publish a report


documenting the cost savings resulting from shared services


contracts. The provisions of this subsection shall not be


applicable to the Oklahoma State Regents for Higher Education or to

Req. No. 3528 Page 5


any institutions within The Oklahoma State System of Higher


Education.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2026.


SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-2-3528 MSBB 1/14/2026 2:41:00 PM































Req. No. 3528 Page 6